Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 3. Boating Safety.
§ 29.1-739.2.
Conservation police officers to patrol lakes.

The Department shall have an enhanced enforcement effort that is commensurate with the level of boating activity from Memorial Day through Labor Day in the waters of those Virginia lakes that (i) are of a size comparable to or greater than Smith Mountain Lake and (ii) have a comparable number of reported boating accidents during the last five years as Smith Mountain Lake.

History.

2005, c. 233; 2007, c. 87; 2008, c. 535.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “Conservation police officers” for “Game wardens” at the beginning of the section heading and substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” near the beginning of the section.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 535 substituted “an enhanced enforcement effort that is commensurate with the level of boating activity from Memorial” for “at least one conservation police officer whose primary responsibility shall be to patrol during the daylight hours from Memorial” near the beginning of this section.

§ 29.1-740.
Duty to stop and render assistance; penalties for violations.

It shall be the duty of every operator of a vessel involved in a collision to stop and render assistance as required by §

29.1-739

. If any person knowingly fails to comply with the provisions of §

29.1-739

when the collision, accident or other casualty results in serious bodily injury to, or the death of, any person, he shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony. If any person knowingly fails to comply with the provisions of § 29.1-739, when the collision, accident or other casualty results only in damage to property, he shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. However, if the vessel struck is unattended and the damage is less than fifty dollars, such person shall be punished only by a fine not exceeding fifty dollars.

History.

1975, c. 429, § 62.1-177.1; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-741.
Furnishing information to agency of United States.

In accordance with any request duly made by an authorized official or agency of the United States, any information compiled or otherwise available to the Department pursuant to subsection B of §

29.1-739

shall be transmitted to the official or agency of the United States.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.12; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-178; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-742.
Towing water skis, surfboards, etc.

No person shall operate a vessel on any waters of the Commonwealth for towing a person or persons on water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device unless there is in the vessel a person, in addition to the operator, in a position to observe the progress of the person or persons being towed or unless the skier or skiers wear life preservers.

No person shall operate a vessel on any water of the Commonwealth towing a person or persons on water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device, nor shall any person engage in water skiing or a similar activity at any time between the hours from one-half hour after sunset to one-half hour before sunrise. The provisions of this subsection shall not constitute a defense to any provision of §

29.1-738

.

The provisions of subsections A and B of this section do not apply to a performer engaged in a professional exhibition.

No person shall operate or manipulate any vessel, towrope, or other device by which the direction or location of water skis, a surfboard, or a similar device may be affected or controlled in such a way as to cause the water skis, surfboard, or similar device, or any person upon the device to collide with any object or person.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.13; 1962, c. 626; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-179; 1982, c. 236; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 265; 1993, c. 275; 1997, c. 108.

§ 29.1-743.
Repealed by Acts 1997, c. 108.

Editor’s note.

Former §

29.1-743

, relating to regattas, races, marine parades, tournaments or exhibitions, derived from Acts 1960, c. 500, § 62-174.14; 1962, c. 626; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-181; 1987, c. 488; 1993, c. 623.

§ 29.1-744.
Local regulation; application for placement or removal of “no wake” buoys, etc.

Any political subdivision of this Commonwealth may, at any time, but only after public notice, formally apply to the Board for special rules and regulations with reference to the safe and reasonable operation of vessels on any water within its territorial limits and shall specify in the application the reasons which make the special rules or regulations necessary or appropriate.

The Board is authorized upon application by a political subdivision or its own motion to make special or general rules and regulations with reference to the safe and reasonable operation of vessels on any waters within the territorial limits of any political subdivision of this Commonwealth. Without limiting the generality of the grant of such power, a system of regulatory or navigational markers may be adopted by the Board. Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the application of any general law concerning the tidal waters of this Commonwealth.

Any county, city or town of this Commonwealth may enact ordinances which parallel general law regulating the operation of vessels on any waters within its territorial limits, including the marginal adjacent ocean, and the conduct and activity of any person using such waters. The locality may also provide for enforcement and penalties for the violation of the ordinances, provided the penalties do not exceed the penalties provided in this chapter for similar offenses.

After notice to the Department, any county, city or town may, by ordinance, establish “no wake” zones along the waterways within the locality in order to protect public safety and prevent erosion damage to adjacent property. However, any county that is adjacent to an inland lake (i) more than 500 feet above sea level and (ii) of 20,000 acres or more and wholly located within the Commonwealth may, by ordinance, establish “no wake” zones along such lake within the locality in order to protect public safety or prevent erosion damage to adjacent property. The markers and buoys designating a no wake zone shall conform to the requirements established by the Board. Any marker or buoy which is not placed in conformance with the regulations of the Board or which is not properly maintained shall be removed by the locality. The locality may provide for enforcement and penalties for the violation of the ordinance.

Any person who desires to place or remove “no wake” buoys or other markers relating to the safe and efficient operation of vessels pursuant to any local ordinance shall apply to the local governing body. The local governing body shall approve, disapprove or approve with modifications the application and forward it to the Director, who shall approve, disapprove or approve with modifications within thirty days the placement and type of marker to be used or the removal of “no wake” buoys or other markers. The cost of the purchase and placement or the removal of the buoys or markers shall be borne by the person requesting the placement or removal of the buoys or markers. Any marker or buoy which is not placed in conformance with the regulations of the Board or which is not properly maintained may be removed by the Department. “No wake” buoys or other markers placed prior to July 1, 2001, shall only be removed when no longer required for the safe and efficient operation of vessels pursuant to any local ordinance.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.15; 1964, cc. 346, 654; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-182; 1978, c. 598; 1982, c. 232; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 522; 1999, c. 489; 2001, c. 649.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 649 added the second sentence in subsection D, and added the last sentence in subsection E.

§ 29.1-744.1.
Repealed by Acts 1998, c. 537, effective January 1, 1999.

Editor’s note.

Former §

29.1-744.1

, relating to local regulation of personal watercraft distance from shore, was derived from Acts 1991, c. 409; 1995, c. 236; 1998, c. 531.

§ 29.1-744.2.
Repealed by Acts 1998, c. 857, effective January 1, 1999.

Editor’s note.

Former §

29.1-744.2

, which provided for local regulation of motorboat distance and authorized a penalty, was derived from Acts 1993, c. 74; 1998, c. 110.

§ 29.1-744.3.
Slacken speed and control wakes near structures.

It shall be unlawful to operate any motorboat, except a personal watercraft, at a speed greater than the slowest possible speed required to maintain steerage and headway when within 50 feet or less of docks, piers, boathouses, boat ramps, or a person in the water, unless such person in the water (i) is being towed by the motorboat or (ii) is accompanying the motorboat, provided that such motorboat is propelled by an inboard motor or a means of propulsion that is below the water line and forward of (a) the transom or (b) an integrated swim platform.

History.

1998, c. 857; 2012, c. 700; 2018, cc. 117, 637.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 700, in the first sentence, substituted “or a person” for “and people” and added “unless such person in the water (i) is being towed by the motorboat or (ii) is accompanying the motorboat, provided that such motorboat is propelled by an inboard motor” at the end; and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “Nothing in this section shall prohibit a motorboat from towing a person with a rope less than fifty feet in length.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 117 and 637 are identical, and inserted “a” preceding “personal watercraft” and added “or a means of propulsion that is below the water line and forward of (a) the transom or (b) an integrated swim platform” at the end.

§ 29.1-744.4.
“Pass-through” zones; local ordinances; penalties.

After providing notice to the Department, any locality may, by ordinance, establish “pass-through” zones in any portion of a waterway within its territorial limits where congestion of watercraft traffic routinely poses a significant safety risk to persons in such designated area. The ordinance shall provide that while in a pass-through zone, operators of watercraft shall maintain a reasonable and safe speed and shall be prohibited from stopping, anchoring, loitering, or otherwise engaging in recreational activity. The locality shall clearly identify pass-through zones by buoys or other markers that conform to the general requirements as established by the Board for similar buoys or markers. The locality may provide for enforcement and penalties, not to exceed a Class 4 misdemeanor, for the violation of the ordinance.

History.

2003, c. 780.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Authority of localities to regulate state-owned submerged lands. —

Virginia localities do not have the authority to extend the application of their land use ordinances to state-owned submerged lands, therefore, for small renewable energy projects located on or in the waters above state-owned bottomland, there are no “applicable land use ordinances” for purposes of the certification requirement of subdivision B 2 of § 10.1-1197.6. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. David K. Paylor, Director, Virginia Department of Environmental Quality, 10-091, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 88 (12/30/10).

§ 29.1-745.
Enforcement of chapter; vessels displaying Coast Guard inspection decal.

Every conservation police officer, officer of the Virginia Marine Police, and other law-enforcement officer of the Commonwealth and its subdivisions shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall have authority to stop, board, and inspect any vessel subject to this chapter after having identified himself in his official capacity. Except for enforcement of §

29.1-738

and the requirement of having the registration certificate on board, the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any vessel of 26 feet or more in length on which is displayed a current valid United States Coast Guard or United States Coast Guard Auxiliary inspection decal.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, no conservation police officer, officer of the Virginia Marine Police, or other law-enforcement officer shall, without the consent of the owner, stop, board, or inspect any noncommercial vessel subject to this chapter unless such officer has reasonable suspicion that a violation of law or regulation exists, except that conservation police officers and officers of the Virginia Marine Police may conduct lawful stops or boardings to inspect hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses pursuant to §§

28.2-231

and

29.1-337

or to inspect creel and bag limits pursuant to §

29.1-209

and may conduct lawful boating safety checkpoints in accordance with established agency policy.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.17; 1964, c. 654; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-184; 1980, c. 567; 1987, c. 488; 2007, c. 87; 2015, c. 484.

Cross references.

As to authority of Marine Resources Commission inspectors to make arrests for violation of this chapter, with or without warrants, see §

28.2-900

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” near the beginning of the first sentence.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 484 inserted the subsection A designation, substituted “officer of the Virginia Marine Police, and” for “Marine Resources Commission inspector, and every” in the first sentence and substituted “subsection” for “section” and “26” for “twenty-six” in the second sentence; and added subsection B.

§ 29.1-746.
Penalties.

Unless specified otherwise, any person who violates any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted under this chapter shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor for each such violation.

Upon the conviction of any person for the violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted thereunder for which the criminal penalty is a Class 3 misdemeanor or greater, the court shall order the person to complete and pass a boating safety course approved by the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators and accepted by the Department. A list of such courses shall be made available by the Department. Any person who has been ordered by the court to complete and pass a boating safety course shall submit to the court, in a form approved by the Department, proof of completion and passage of the course within six months of the time of his conviction. If the person who has been required to complete and pass a boating safety course is under 18 years of age, the court may require the person to obtain parental consent to enroll in the course. If the person does not complete and pass the boating safety course within the prescribed time period, the court may, for good cause, extend the period for completion; however, absent good cause, the court shall impose a fine not to exceed $250.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.18; 1962, c. 626; 1964, c. 654; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-185; 1984, c. 417; 1987, c. 488; 2006, c. 23.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 and Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 23 designated the former provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsection B.